GRAMMARS/GERMAN/FST1/src/prop-names.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# CONTENT:	First and last (person) names
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:	GERMAN
!#
!# AUTHOR:	A. Schiller
!#
!# CREATED:	10-Jan-2007
!# ============================================================================
!# USAGE:	xfst -e "read lexc [ThisFile]" -l rules-prop.xfst
!# ============================================================================
!#
!# SOURCES: 
!# [1]: old analyser (cf. old-roots.txt)

Multichar_Symbols
+Prop			! proper name

+Firstname			! first (given) name
+Lastname			! last (family) name
+Full			! full name
+Celeb			! famous people (history, fiction, ...)
+Masc +Fem		! masculine, feminine or both
 
+Cpd			! Compound part
+Sg			! singular
+Pl			! plural
+GenS			! marked genitive s
+NomAccDatGen		! any case



LEXICON _FIRSTMASC	< %+Prop:0 %+Firstname:0 %+Masc:0 >	_PROPSG ;
LEXICON _FIRSTFEM	< %+Prop:0 %+Firstname:0 %+Fem:0 > 	_PROPSG ;

LEXICON _FULLNAMEMASC	< %+Prop:0 %+Full:0 %+Masc:0 > 	_PROPSG ;
LEXICON _FULLNAMEFEM	< %+Prop:0 %+Full:0 %+Fem:0 > 	_PROPSG ;

LEXICON _LASTCELEB	< %+Prop:0 %+Lastname:0 %+Celeb:0 > 	_PROPSG ;
			< %+Prop:0 %+Lastname:0  %+Celeb:0 > 	_PROPPL ;
			_ISCH ;

LEXICON _LASTNAME	< %+Prop:0 %+Lastname:0 > 	_PROPSG ;
			< %+Prop:0 %+Lastname:0 > 	_PROPPL ;


LEXICON ROOT
		ROOT1 ;	!# simple form

LEXICON TRUNC
 	%+Cpd:%-	# ;	!# left part of a compound

LEXICON _PROPSG
							TRUNC ;
	< %+Sg:0 "@D.frm.low@" >			# ;	! Peter, Hans
	< %+Sg:0 %+GenS "@D.frm.low@" >			# ;	! Peters, Hans'

LEXICON _PROPPL
	< %+Pl:%^PPl "@D.frm.low@" >			# ;	! (die) Maiers

LEXICON _ISCH
	< %^I s c h %+Adj:0 >			TRUNC ;
	< %^I s c h "@R.frm.low@" >		_ADJFLEX ;
	< %^I s c h "@R.frm.upp@" >		_NADJFLEX ;
			

LEXICON _NADJFLEX	
	< %+NAdj:0 %+Lastname:0 %+Pos:0 > 		AdjFlexReg ;

LEXICON _ADJFLEX	
	< %+Adj:0 %+Lastname:0 %+Pos:0 > 		AdjFlexReg ;
	< %+Adj:0 %+Lastname:0 %+Pos:0 %+Pred:0 >	#;

LEXICON AdjFlexReg
	< %+Masc:0 %+Sg:0 %+Nom:0 %+Wk:0 0:{e} >		# ;	! [der] kleine [Mann]
	< %+Masc:0 %+Sg:0 %+Nom:0 %+St:0 0:{er} >		# ;	! [ein] kleiner [Mann]
	< %+Masc:0 %+Sg:0 %+AccGen:0 %+WkSt:0 0:{en} >		# ;	! [den/ohne;des/trotz] kleinen [Mann(es)]
	< %+Masc:0 %+Sg:0 %+Dat:0 %+St:0 0:{em} >		# ;	! [mit] kleinem [Mann]
	< %+Masc:0 %+Sg:0 %+Dat:0 %+Wk:0 0:{en} >		# ;	! [dem] kleinen [Mann]

	< %+Neut:0 %+Sg:0 %+NomAcc:0 %+St:0 0:{es} >		# ;	! [ein/ohne] kleines [Kind]
	< %+Neut:0 %+Sg:0 %+NomAcc:0 %+Wk:0 0:{e} >		# ;	! [das] kleine [Kind]
	< %+Neut:0 %+Sg:0 %+Dat:0 %+St:0 0:{em} >		# ;	! [mit] kleinem [Kind]
	< %+Neut:0 %+Sg:0 %+Dat:0 %+Wk:0 0:{en} >		# ;	! [dem] kleinen [Kind]
	< %+Neut:0 %+Sg:0 %+Gen:0 %+WkSt:0 0:{en} >		# ;	! [des/trotz] kleinen [Kindes]

	< %+Fem:0 %+Sg:0 %+NomAcc:0 %+WkSt:0 0:{e} >		# ;	! [eine/die] kleine [Frau]
	< %+Fem:0 %+Sg:0 %+DatGen:0 %+St:0 0:{er} >		# ;	! [trotz/mit] kleiner [Frau]
	< %+Fem:0 %+Sg:0 %+DatGen:0 %+Wk:0 0:{en} >		# ;	! [trotz/mit einer] kleinen [Frau]

	< %+MFN:0 %+Pl:0 %+NomAccGen:0 %+Wk:0 0:{en} >		# ;	! [die/der/den] kleinen [Leute/Leuten]
	< %+MFN:0 %+Pl:0 %+NomAcc:0 %+St:0 0:{e} >		# ;	! [als/für] kleine [Leute]
	< %+MFN:0 %+Pl:0 %+Gen:0 %+St:0 0:{er} >		# ;	! [trotz] kleiner [Leute]
	< %+MFN:0 %+Pl:0 %+Dat:0 %+WkSt:0 0:{en} >		# ;	! [mit] kleinen [Leuten]

LEXICON ROOT1
Alexandra			 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Amanda				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Anja				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Annegret			 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Anngret				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Ariane				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Barbie				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Bettina				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Brigitta			 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Carmen				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Catharina			 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Chris				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Claire				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Cora				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Cäcilie				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Dora				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Edeltraud			 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Eleonore			 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Elli				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Esmeralda			 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Eveline				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Freya				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Gail				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Gesine				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Gretel				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Hedwig				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Helene				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Hildegard			 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Ina				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Irene				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Isabelle			 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Jasmina				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Joan				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Julia				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Karola				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Katja				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Klaudia				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Lene				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Liese				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Liselotte			 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Lucia				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Maggie				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Margit				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Marianna			 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Marita				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Mascha				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Meredith			 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Mona				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Natascha			 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Olara				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Peggy				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Renate				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Roswitha			 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Sarah				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Sigurd				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Solana				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Stephanie			 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Sylvia				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Thekla				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Traude				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Ursel				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Verena				 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Waltraud			 _FIRSTFEM ; !# [1]
Achmed				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Ahmad				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Aldo				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Alfonso				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Amato				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Andrei				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Anthonis			 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Arkan				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Arthur				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Barack			 	 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Benjamin			 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Bernward			 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Bill				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Borislav			 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Burckhard			 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Carlo				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Charles				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Claude				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Cornelius			 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Daniel				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Detlef				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Diethelm			 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Dominik				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Eberhart			 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Eddy				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Edwin				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Eike				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Elton				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Erol				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Fernando			 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Friedbert			 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Gerhard				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Giulio				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Gunther				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Hans				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Heinrich			 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Heribert			 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Ian				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Jacques				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Jeremy				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Jonah				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Jupp				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Kenneth				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Lars				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Louis				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Manuel				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Matthes				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Michelangelo			 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Mustafa				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Oliver				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Pablo				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Philipp				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Ralph				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Ricky				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Rudolph				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Sebastian			 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Slobodan			 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Teodoro				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Tommy				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Uwe				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Walter				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Willibald			 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Yehudi				 _FIRSTMASC ; !# [1]
Alten	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP "von .."
Anger	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Arx	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP "von .."
Bade	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Baltensberger	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Baumbach	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Becht	_LASTCELEB ; ! frequent name,VIP
Behrend	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Bergonzi	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Beutel	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Bittner	_LASTCELEB ; ! frequent name,VIP
Blau	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Böhringer	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Bombardier	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Bosch	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Brass	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Brückmann	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Buchoux	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Büscher	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Capito	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Ciechanover	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Crass	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Deck	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Dengler	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Disl	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Dold	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Ducret	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Eberhardt	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Eichheim	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Engelhard	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Euler-Chelpin	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP "von .."
Fenzl	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Ferrari	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Fournier	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Frenz	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Furtwängler	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Gebhard	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Gérard	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Glöckner	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Godden	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Graßl	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Greiffenberg	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP "von .."
Grüner	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Guschlbauer	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Häfele	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Hansen	_LASTCELEB ; ! frequent name,VIP
Haß	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Heerwagen	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Heinke	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Hermanns	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Heroles	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Hipp	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Hodjak	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Hörl	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Hottiger	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Isene	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Jänicke	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Joloff	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Kallenbach	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Kargus	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Kehr	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Kiel	_LASTCELEB ; ! frequent name,VIP
Klaiber	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Klughardt	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Knaus	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Köllner	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Köring	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Kremser	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Krojer	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Kuhn	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Küster	_LASTCELEB ; ! frequent name,VIP
Lasutina	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Laufer	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Leuenberger	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Liebscher	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Lödel	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Lyman	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Mader	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Marey	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Mazzarelli	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Mehnert	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Meyerhof	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Middendorf	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Monot	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Mühle	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Mylius	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Nickl	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Niebergall	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Ohtsubo	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Olschewski	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Parfit	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Pesko	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Petry	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Poethen	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Potthoff	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Protzner	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Rathmann	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Recknagel	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Rein	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Rezzonico	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Rogge	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Rotter	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Rupp	_LASTCELEB ; ! frequent name,VIP
Saller	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Schepers	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Schlumbohm	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Schmidl	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Schuhmacher	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Schwerdtfeger	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Sehling	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Siemers	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Speelmans	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Stapf	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Stengel	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Strube	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Stührk	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Thimm	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Tito	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Ulbrich	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Vico	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP
Wedel	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Weitzel	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Welker	_LASTCELEB ; ! frequent name,VIP
Wilken	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Wöss	_LASTCELEB ; ! VIP "von .."
Wulff	_LASTNAME ; ! frequent name
Alexander			 _FULLNAMEMASC ; !# [1]
Kleopatra			 _FULLNAMEFEM ;
